Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1302
Daylight time; when.

Daylight time for the State of Nebraska shall be in effect from the first Sunday in April until the last Sunday in October of each year at such clock time as is prescribed in the Uniform Time Act of 1966.

Laws 1974, LB 651, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 774, § 2.